Hawaii statutes.
[§342G-48] Recycling market development.
Databases on solid waste management alternatives and businesses involved in
recycling and bioconversion shall be developed and maintained as follows:

(1) Within one year of its establishment, the office
shall develop a database on the full range of solid waste management
alternatives. This database shall include, but not be limited to, information
on technology description, effectiveness, level of use elsewhere, available
vendors, and cost. This database shall be offered for the use of the public
and private sectors; and

(2) By January 1, 1993, the department of
business, economic development, and tourism shall develop a database that
identifies businesses involved in recycling and bioconversion. This database
shall identify businesses that collect, transport, process, market, reuse, or
purchase these goods. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next